District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-307

Starplex Fund.

Repealed.

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 341, ch. 418, § 8
Aug. 4, 1955, 69 Stat. 498, ch. 562,§ 1
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 423, Pub. L. 85-561, § 2(a)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 2
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-113, § 2(2), 23 DCR 8742
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(o)(3)-(6), 27 DCR 1776
Oct. 19, 1989, D.C. Law 8-44, § 2, 36 DCR 5777
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(c), 41 DCR 4636
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(h)
1981 Ed., § 2-307.
1973 Ed., § 2-1708.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 8(h) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).